Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.130

Child victims of sexual assaults, identification confidential. (Effective until July 1, 2025.)

(1) Information revealing the specific details that describe the alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault under age eighteen, or the identity or contact information of an alleged or proven child victim under age eighteen is confidential and not subject to release to the press or public without the permission of the child victim and the child's legal guardian. Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which the child victim is a relative, stepchild, or stepsibling of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Contact information includes phone numbers, email addresses, social media profiles, and user names and passwords. Contact information or information identifying the child victim of sexual assault may be released to law enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault. Prior to release of any criminal history record information, the releasing agency shall delete any contact information or information identifying a child victim of sexual assault from the information except as provided in this section.

(2) This section does not apply to court documents or other materials admitted in open judicial proceedings.

[ 2019 c 300 s 2; 1992 c 188 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1992 c 188: See notes following RCW 7.69A.020.

PDFRCW 10.97.130

Child victims of sexual assaults and commercial sexual exploitation, identification confidential. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

(1) Information revealing the specific details that describe the alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation under age 18, or the identity or contact information of an alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation under age 18 is confidential and not subject to release to the press or public without the permission of the child victim and the child's legal guardian. Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which the child victim is a relative, stepchild, or stepsibling of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Contact information includes phone numbers, email addresses, social media profiles, and user names and passwords. Contact information or information identifying the child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation may be released to law enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault. Prior to release of any criminal history record information, the releasing agency shall delete any contact information or information identifying a child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation from the information except as provided in this section.

(2) This section does not apply to court documents or other materials admitted in open judicial proceedings.

(3) For purposes of this section, "commercial sexual exploitation" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010.

[ 2024 c 298 s 20; 2019 c 300 s 2; 1992 c 188 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 298: See note following RCW 9A.40.100.

Findings—Intent—Severability—1992 c 188: See notes following RCW 7.69A.020.